Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [1.1482] STATE VEGETABLE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Designation. new text end new text begin The pea, the seed from the Pisum sativum plant, is designated as the official state vegetable of the state of Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Photograph. new text end new text begin A photograph of a pea may be displayed in the Office of the Secretary of State. new text end